Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1642
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Community Health Worker Training Endorsement Act:

(1) Community health worker means an individual who has successfully completed an endorsed community health worker training program and has a close understanding of the community served and who acts as a liaison between health, behavioral health, and social service systems and the community to facilitate access, promote understanding, and improve health outcomes;

(2) Community health worker services means preventive, outreach, education, navigation, advocacy, and social support services provided by a community health worker;

(3) Core competencies means the knowledge, skills, and abilities a certified community health worker is required to demonstrate as determined by the department;

(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(5) Endorsed community health worker training program means an education or training program that the department has determined meets minimum standards, including core competencies as defined by the department, for the purpose of qualifying for reimbursement by medicaid and private insurers.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 3.
July 18, 2026